Utah statutes.
63G-6a-304.   Delegation of authority.

(1)  In accordance with rules made by the board, the chief procurement officer may delegate authority to designees or to any department, agency, or official.

(2)  For a procurement under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program, any delegation by the chief procurement officer under this section shall be made to the Governor's Office of Economic Development.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

